Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.250

Temporary facilities at trade fairs, etc.

An alien bank may operate temporary facilities at trade fairs or other commercial events of short duration without first obtaining the approval of the director: PROVIDED, That the activities of such temporary facility are limited solely to the dissemination of information: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, If an alien bank engages in such activity, it shall notify the director in writing prior to opening of the nature and location of such facility. The director is empowered to investigate the operation of such temporary facility if he or she deems it necessary, and to collect from the alien bank the estimated actual cost thereof.

[ 1994 c 92 s 97; 1973 1st ex.s. c 53 s 25. Formerly RCW 30.42.250.]